Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1250.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The General Assembly recognizes the following public policy purposes and declares that the following objectives of the Commonwealth are to be served by this act:(1) Pennsylvania faces a significant shortage of affordable housing units that contributes to higher rates of homelessness and housing instability, impacting the well-being of many residents.(2) The lack of affordable housing also affects this Commonwealth's economic competitiveness and educational and 12345678910111213141516171819 health outcomes.(3) Manufactured homes are a vital part of the affordable housing market because buying a manufactured home remains a relatively affordable alternative to purchasing a higher-cost traditional home.(4) Manufactured home communities in this Commonwealth are home to many low-income to moderate-income individuals and families.(5) Homes in manufactured home communities, however, are subject to lot leases with ever-increasing rents determined by the landowner who controls the land on which the homes sit.(6) It is difficult and expensive to move a manufactured home once it has been set on a foundation making the residents of manufactured home communities especially vulnerable to exploitation.(7) For manufactured home community owners, the difficulty residents face in moving their homes means a consistent source of revenue, including during economic downturns.(8) Large corporations and private equity firms have been buying up manufactured home communities in this Commonwealth, leading to resident complaints of drastic increases in lot rents, a lack of onsite management and a lack of repairs.(9) Unlike traditional homes which appreciate over time, the value of manufactured homes decreases over time and this decrease can be accelerated by predatory lot rent increases disguised as necessary improvements.(10) Homeowners who are unable to pay unaffordable rent 20250HB1250PN1379 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 increases face eviction and the loss of their home due to the high cost and extreme difficulty of moving it.(11) Homeowners who are able to remain struggle to pay the increased rent and are often faced with deteriorating living conditions and a loss of value in their homes.(12) The public good and the general welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth require the exercise of the police powers of the Commonwealth to regulate lot rents in manufactured home communities.(13) Regulating lot rents in manufactured home communities is a valid means of exercising the police powers of the Commonwealth to protect the public health, safety and welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth and safeguard vulnerable residents of manufactured home communities from exploitation.(14) Regulating lot rents in manufactured home communities by providing for reasonable annual lot rent increases up to the average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Northeast Region, for the most recently available 12-month period, but no less than 2% nor more than 4%, with exceptions for extraordinary increases in operating expenses, ensures that landowners can get a fair return on their investment.(15) Regulating lot rents in manufactured home communities by providing for reasonable annual lot rent increases up to the average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Northeast Region, for the most recently available 12-month period, but no less than 2% nor more than 4%, with exceptions for extraordinary increases in operating expenses, is not unreasonable, unduly burdensome 20250HB1250PN1379 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or patently beyond what is necessary to protect the public health, safety and welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth and safeguard vulnerable residents of manufactured home communities from exploitation.(16) Prohibiting landowners from increasing the lot rent during the pendency of an unresolved health or safety violation, except under conditions designed to ensure the correction of all health or safety violations, is a valid means of exercising the police powers of the Commonwealth to protect the public health, safety and welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth and safeguard vulnerable residents of manufactured home communities from exploitation. (17) With stable land tenure and prohibition against predatory rent practices, a manufactured home becomes a wealth-building asset for a family, and residents are more likely to become active stakeholders in the improvement and upkeep of their community.Section 2. The act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.2. Resident Associations and Group Meetings.--(a) A manufactured home community owner may not prohibit or interfere with the operation of a resident association.(b) A manufactured home community owner shall allow group meetings on site between residents without any limitations related to the number of residents, location of the meetings and the timing of meetings.Section 3. Section 6(c) and (e) introductory paragraph and (2) of the act are amended to read:Section 6. Disclosure of Fees.--* * *20250HB1250PN1379 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Failure to disclose such rent, fees, service charges and assessments shall render them void and unenforceable in the courts of the Commonwealth. Increases in such rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the owner shall be unenforceable until [30] 90 days after notice thereof has been posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the manufactured home community and mailed to the manufactured home lessee. However, rent shall not be increased during the term of the lease.* * *(e) All new leases, lease extensions and lease renewals[, which are for more than a 60-day period,] shall contain the following full disclosures:* * *(2) An explanation of the manner in which the manufactured home space rental amount will be increased, including, but not limited to, notification to the manufactured home lessee at least [60] 90 days in advance of the increase.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 6.1. Reasonable Increases in Rent and Fees.--(a) A manufactured home community owner or operator may increase rent, fees, service charges or assessments for any 12-month period, effective upon the renewal or extension of a lease for a manufactured home lot on or after the effective date of this subsection, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The community owner or operator must notify all manufactured home lessees and manufactured home tenants of the proposed rent increase by hand delivery or mail addressed to 20250HB1250PN1379 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 their residences at least 90 days prior to the effective date of the increase.(2) Except as provided in section 6.2, and except for charges imposed by a limited equity cooperative association subject to 68 Pa.C.S. Pt. II Subpt. C (relating to cooperatives), the aggregate increase in rent, fees, service charges and assessments does not exceed the average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Northeast Region, for the most recently available 12-month period. If the average 12-month CPI-U is:(i) lower than 2%, the community owner or operator may increase rent, fees, service charges and assessments by up to 2%; and(ii) greater than 4%, the community owner or operator may increase rent, fees, service charges and assessments by no more than 4%.(3) The community owner or operator has not been found by a local code official, the Department of Environmental Protection, other enforcement entity or court to be in violation of any applicable health or safety law or regulation, unless the violation has been fully resolved at least 90 days prior to the effective date of the increase.(b) Failure to comply with the procedures in this section shall render any attempted increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments void and unenforceable in the courts of the Commonwealth.Section 6.2. Justified Rent Increase to Support Extraordinary Increases in Operating Expenses.--(a) A manufactured home community owner or operator may increase rent, fees, service charges or assessments under section 6.1(a) that 20250HB1250PN1379 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exceed the limits in section 6.1(a)(2), as necessary to support extraordinary increases in operating expenses, if:(1) The community owner or operator must notify all manufactured home lessees and manufactured home tenants of the proposed extraordinary rent increase by hand delivery or mail addressed to their residences at least 90 days prior to the effective date of the increase. The notice must include copies of a financial summary certified as accurate by the owner or its accounting firm, to include:(i) a description of the operating cost item or items which have increased, the amount of the increase and the impact of such increase on the owner's or operator's revenues, expenses and profit.(ii) an estimate of the amount of revenue that will be generated as a result of the proposed increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments; and(iii) an explanation of the lessees' rights to request a meeting with the owner or operator under this section and to oppose the extraordinary increase by filing a complaint with the Attorney General or filing a legal action in the court of common pleas.(2) A resident association, if one exists, or a committee designated by a petition signed by at least 25% of the households residing on the lots that would be subject to the proposed increase, may request a meeting with the owner or operator in writing at any time within 30 days of the delivery of the notice. The owner or operator must meet with the resident association or committee in person at a mutually convenient place and time within 15 days of the request. The meeting must be open to all residents who wish to attend. At the meeting, the 20250HB1250PN1379 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owner or operator shall in good faith disclose and explain all material factors resulting in the decision to propose the increase, as well as any other matter concerning the operation and management of the community that the resident association or committee wishes to discuss.(b) At any time after 45 days from the delivery of the notice, any lessee, group of lessees or resident association, if one exists, may challenge the reasonableness of the proposed increase by filing a complaint with the Attorney General or by initiating a civil action in the court of common pleas. In either case, the owner or operator has the burden to demonstrate that the amount of the requested increase is an accurate estimate of the amount needed to cover the documented increase in the owner's eligible operating expenses. If the Attorney General attempts to resolve the dispute through mediation and the owner or operator declines to participate, the increase shall be void and unenforceable.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Maintenance costs for which the owner is solely responsible." Include:(1) the cost of regular maintenance and repair of all roads, sidewalks, parking pads, storm water drainage systems and common areas;(2) the maintenance, care, removal and replacement of all trees within the community; and(3) the routine maintenance and repair of all sewer lines, water lines, utility service lines and related connections owned and provided by the owner or operator to the utility pedestal or 20250HB1250PN1379 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufactured home space."Operating expense." Taxes, insurance, utility charges, onsite employee costs, maintenance costs for which the owner is solely responsible and third party charges directly necessary for the operation of the community. The term does not include any cost related to acquisition, capital improvements, debt service or any increase in the return on the owner's investment.Section 5. Section 13(e) and (f) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Damages.--* * *(e) When the manufactured home community owner or operator and a manufactured home lessee execute a new, renewed or extended lease for a manufactured home space, which increases rent or payables to the lessor, the manufactured home community owner or operator may not collect increased rent or fee payable rent from the manufactured home lessee until the manufactured home community owner or operator and the manufactured home lessee have entered into the new, renewed or extended lease. After receiving 60 days' notice of the community owner's or operator's intent to offer a new lease, the manufactured home occupant shall have [30] 60 days to either accept the new, renewed or extended rental agreement or to notify the manufactured home community owner or operator of intent to vacate within [30 days.] 60 days from the latest to occur of the following:(1) receipt of the community owner's or operator's intent to offer a new lease;(2) receipt of notification by the Attorney General that the lessee's complaint challenging the reasonableness of the proposed increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments 20250HB1250PN1379 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has been closed; or(3) the issuance of a final decision on any legal challenge to the proposed increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments.No increased rent or fee lease charges shall be effective against a lessee prior to the 61st day after receiving the owner or operator notice.(f) A manufactured home lessee who chooses not to enter into a new, renewed or extended rental agreement shall have [60] 90 days from the date of notification of intent to vacate the manufactured home community to enter into a contract to sell or to relocate the manufactured home. No increased rent fee or lease charge shall apply during this period. So long as the manufactured home community owner or operator complied with [disclosure as provided in section 6] the requirements of sections 6, 6.1 and 6.2, as applicable, the manufactured home lessee who does not enter into a new, extended or renewed rental agreement shall not be entitled to relocation costs.(g) In addition to all other available rights, remedies and damages, an affected lessee may file an action for abatement, nullification or restitution of any increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments imposed in violation of the requirements in section 6, 6.1 or 6.2.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1250PN1379 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324